New Jersey, session 222, A286.
Be It Enacted by the Senate and General Assembly of the State of New Jersey: 1.    Section 4 of P.L.1983, c.135 (C.56:8-29) is amended to read as follows: 4.    a.  Within 120 days after receipt of the completed application, fee and bond, if any, and when the director is satisfied that the applicant has complied with all of the requirements of this act, the director shall grant and issue a certificate of registration to the applicant. b.    The certificate of registration granted may be renewed for a period of two years upon the payment of a renewal fee which shall be determined by the director and shall not exceed $500. c.     No certificate of registration shall be transferred or assigned without the approval of the director.  Any request for a change in the location of the premises operated by any registrant situated in and operating in this State shall be submitted to the director in writing no less than 30 days prior to that relocation.  The certificate of registration shall run to January 1 in the second year next ensuing the date thereof unless sooner revoked by the director. d.    The division shall: (1)   maintain and update, as necessary, a list of all registered ticket brokers in New Jersey pursuant to P.L.1983, c.135 (C.56:8-26 et seq.); and (2)   display the list on the divisions Internet website. (cf: P.L.2001, c.394, s.4) 2.    This act shall take effect on the 90th day after the date of enactment.